Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.130

Recording of hearing.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section or required by law of this state other than this chapter, an arbitration hearing need not be recorded unless required by the arbitrator, provided by the arbitration agreement, or requested by a party.

(2) An arbitrator shall record, electronically or otherwise, any part of an arbitration hearing concerning a child-related dispute.

[ 2023 c 61 s 14.]